Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB220.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The heading of section 1202.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1202.1. [Instructional] Special Education Certificate Grade Spans and Age Levels and Duties of Department.--* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1202.2. Instructional Certificate Grade Spans and Age Levels.--(a) Notwithstanding 22 Pa. Code § 49.85 (relating to limitations), the grade spans and age levels for instructional certificates issued after December 31, 2025 , shall 1234567891011121314151617181920 be as follows:(1) Early childhood - prekindergarten, kindergarten, grades one through four or ages three (3) through nine (9).(2) Elementary - kindergarten, grades one through six or ages four (4) through eleven (11).(3) Middle - grades six through nine or ages eleven (11) through fifteen (15).(4) Secondary - grades seven through twelve or ages eleven (11) through twenty-one (21).(5) Specialized areas - prekindergarten through grade twelve or up to age twenty-one (21).(b) Certificates issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(a) and (b) shall remain valid for the term of the certificate.(c) An individual holding Elementary/Middle Certificates issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(b)(2) shall have the opportunity to expand the scope of the individual's certificate to meet the grade levels covered under subsection (a)(2) and (3) by a process determined by the Department of Education, which shall include, but not be limited to, continuing education credits or the satisfactory outcome of a PRAXIS assessment for the specific certification level.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0220PN0169 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223